Utah statutes.
16-6a-714.   Quorum and voting requirements for voting groups.

(1) (a)  Members entitled to vote as a separate voting group may take action on a matter at a meeting only if a quorum of those members exists with respect to that matter.

(b)  Unless otherwise provided in this chapter or in accordance with Section 16-6a-716, at a meeting of the voting group, the members of the voting group that are represented for any purpose at the meeting constitute a quorum of that voting group for action on a matter.

(2)  Once a member is represented for any purpose at a meeting, including the purpose of determining that a quorum exists, the member is considered present for quorum purposes:

(a)  for the remainder of the meeting; and

(b)  for any adjournment of that meeting, unless:

(i)  otherwise provided in the bylaws; or

(ii)  a new record date is or shall be set for that adjourned meeting.

(3)  Action on a matter other than the election of directors by a voting group is approved if:

(a)  a quorum exists;

(b)  the votes cast within the voting group favoring the action exceed the votes cast within the voting group opposing the action; and

(c)  a greater number of affirmative votes is not required by this chapter or the bylaws.

(4)  The election of directors is governed by Section 16-6a-717.



Amended by Chapter 13, 2001 Special Session 1

